Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA TECHNOLOGY ASSOCIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Minnesota Technology Association to support the SciTech internship program, a program that supports science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM) internship opportunities for two- and four-year college students and graduate students in their fields of study. The internship opportunities must match students with paid internships within STEM disciplines at small, for-profit companies located in Minnesota having fewer than 250 employees worldwide. The grant must provide selected hiring companies 50 percent of the wages paid to the intern, capped at $3,000 per intern. The program must work toward increasing the participation among women or other underserved populations. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end